Maine, session 132, LD657.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4301, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2019, c. 126, §2, is further
amended to read:
1. Basic necessities. "Basic necessities" means food, potable water, clothing, shelter,
fuel, electricity, nonelective medical services as recommended by a physician,
nonprescription drugs, telephone where when it is necessary for medical reasons,
broadband Internet access service, wireless access point technology and any other
commodity or service determined essential by the overseer in accordance with the
municipality's ordinance and this chapter. "Basic necessities" do does not include security
deposits for rental property, except for emergency purposes. For the purposes of this
subsection, "emergency purposes" means any situation in which no other permanent
lodging is available unless a security deposit is paid. For the purposes of this subsection,
"broadband Internet access service" has the same meaning as in Title 10, section 1500-U,
subsection 1, paragraph A. For the purposes of this subsection, "wireless access point
technology" means technology that allows devices with wireless capacity to connect to a
network wirelessly.